dev/sah.lat-cyrl.twol
Alphabet

 a:а b:б c:ц č:ч d:д e:э e:е f:ф h:х h:һ i:и ï:ы j:й l:л m:м n:н o:о ö:ө p:п r:р s:с š:ш t:т u:у ü:ү v:в x:х y:ы 

 g:г g:ҕ
 k:к k:ҕ
 q:к q:ҕ q:х

%-:0
%=:0

; 

Sets 

Vow = ü ö ï y o u e a i ;

CyrlVow = а э и о у ы ү ө ;

Rules

"Delete 'h' in ш, ч"
h:0 <=> [ :х | :ш | :ч ] _ ;

"Fricatives"
Cx:Cy <=> _ h: ;
   where Cx in ( s k c )
         Cy in ( ш х ч ) 
   matched ; 

!@ k:х h:0 a:а a:а m:м a:а q:к y:ы t:т

"Nasal ҥ (1)"
g:0 <=> :ҥ _ ; 

"Nasal ҥ (2)"
n:ҥ <=> _ g: ; 

"softsign after n/d"
j:ь <=> [ :д | :н ] _ ;

"enforce к after к"
k:к <= k: _ \h: ; 

"enforce к after к (II)"
k:к <= _ k: \h: ; 

"enforce э after э"
e:э <= e: _  ; 

"enforce э after э (II)"
e:э <= _ e:  ; 


"k is к before т"
k:к <= _ :т ; 

"i is й after vowel"
i:й <=> :CyrlVow _ ;
